Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3345
District courts; compliance required.

For purposes of the establishment, modification, or enforcement of a support order, all district courts shall utilize the Title IV-D Division's statewide automated data processing and information retrieval system. The Title IV-D Division may withhold IV-D funds from any county whose district court is not in compliance with this section.

Laws 1999, LB 637, § 5.